Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-3] Establishment of metropolitan
planning organizations; duties. (a) Metropolitan planning organizations
shall be designated pursuant to 23 United States Code section 134(d)(1) and
shall meet all requirements of 23 United States Code sections 134-135 and 49
United States Code sections 5303-5304, as amended, and any federal regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.

(b) A metropolitan planning organization
shall:

(1) Operate according to executed comprehensive
agreements, including any supplemental agreements, between the State, county,
and other operators of public transportation receiving federal funds; and

(2) Facilitate and support the continuing,
cooperative, and comprehensive transportation planning process between the
State, county, and other operators of public transportation receiving federal
funds, including the consideration of projects and strategies that support
national planning factors as defined in 23 United States Code section 134,
regional goals and objectives, and consideration of plans and planning
activities of others as they affect transportation.

(c) A metropolitan planning organization may:

(1) Assign to staff members duties not defined or
designated by federal law, this chapter, or executive agreement;

(2) Enter into agreements with the State, county,
other operators of public transportation receiving federal funds, and other
entities as needed to fully comply with all requirements of federal law and
this chapter;

(3) Be placed within a state or county agency, as
appropriate, for administrative purposes only;

(4) Contract to purchase goods and services,
including professional and technical assistance and advice;

(5) Contract for or accept revenues, compensation,
proceeds, and gifts or donations or grants in any form from any public agency;
and

(6) Contract with other state or local agencies and
quasi-public or private organizations for the use of their staff resources to
assist the metropolitan planning organization in its functions. [L 2015, c 132,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next